Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 9. Health Care Trust Fund for Tobacco Settlement Funds.

§ 43-13-401.
Declaration of legislative intent.

It is declared by the Legislature that the funds received by the State of Mississippi from tobacco companies in settlement of a certain lawsuit brought against those companies by the State of Mississippi, or as a result of the settlement of any lawsuit brought against tobacco companies by another state, should be applied toward improving the health and health care of the citizens and residents of the state. It is the intent of the Legislature by this article to provide the manner and means necessary to carry out those purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 1999.).

§ 43-13-403.
Definitions.

When used in this article, the following definitions shall apply, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Health Care Trust Fund” means the trust fund established by Section 43-13-405 for the deposit of the funds received by the State of Mississippi as a result of the tobacco settlement, including income from the investment of those funds.

“Health Care Expendable Fund” means the fund established by Section 43-13-407 for the annual transfer of certain funds from the Health Care Trust Fund that are available for appropriation by the Legislature.

“Income” means all interest and dividends derived from the investment of any tobacco settlement funds and any capital gains from the sale or exchange of those investments.

“Tobacco settlement” means the settlement of the case of Mike Moore, Attorney General ex rel. State of Mississippi v. The American Tobacco Company et al. (Chancery Court of Jackson County, Mississippi, Cause No. 94-1429) and the settlement of any case brought against tobacco companies by another state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 493, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 1999.).

§ 43-13-405.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, effective July 1, 2017.

§43-13-405. [Laws, 1999, ch. 493, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 304, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 584, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 514, § 19; Laws, 2009, ch. 563, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 469, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 506, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 518, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 460, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2016.]

§ 43-13-407.
Establishment of Health Care Expendable Fund; annual transfers from Health Care Trust Fund; expenditures to be exclusively for health care purposes; authorization to borrow funds to offset temporary cash flow deficiencies in Expendable Fund [Subsections (1), (2), (3), (5), (6) and (7) repealed effective July 1, 2022].

In accordance with the purposes of this article, there is established in the State Treasury the Health Care Expendable Fund, into which shall be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund the following sums:

In fiscal year 2005, Four Hundred Fifty-six Million Dollars ($456,000,000.00);

In fiscal year 2006, One Hundred Eighty-six Million Dollars ($186,000,000.00);

In fiscal year 2007, One Hundred Eighty-six Million Dollars ($186,000,000.00);

In fiscal year 2008, One Hundred Six Million Dollars ($106,000,000.00);

In fiscal year 2009, Ninety-two Million Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($92,250,000.00);

In the fiscal year beginning after the calendar year in which none of the amount of the annual tobacco settlement installment payment will be deposited into the Health Care Expendable Fund as provided in subsection (3)(d) of this section, and in each fiscal year thereafter, a sum equal to the average annual amount of the dividends, interest and other income, including increases in value of the principal, earned on the funds in the Health Care Trust Fund during the preceding four (4) fiscal years.

In any fiscal year in which interest, dividends and other income from the investment of the funds in the Health Care Trust Fund are not sufficient to fund the full amount of the annual transfer into the Health Care Expendable Fund as required in subsection (1)(f) of this section, the State Treasurer shall transfer from tobacco settlement installment payments an amount that is sufficient to fully fund the amount of the annual transfer.

Beginning with calendar year 2009, at the time that the State of Mississippi receives the tobacco settlement installment payment for each calendar year, the State Treasurer shall deposit the following amounts of each of those installment payments into the Health Care Expendable Fund:

In calendar years 2009 and 2010, the total amount of the installment payment;

In calendar year 2011, the amount of the installment payment less Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00);

In calendar years 2012, 2013 and 2014, the total amount of the installment payment;

In calendar year 2015, and each calendar year thereafter, the total amount of the installment payment.

In addition to any other sums required to be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund, the sum of One Hundred Twelve Million Dollars ($112,000,000.00) shall be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund in fiscal year 2011.

In addition to any other sums required to be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund, the sum of Fifty-six Million Two Hundred Sixty-three Thousand Four Hundred Thirty-eight Dollars ($56,263,438.00) shall be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund during fiscal year 2012.

In addition to any other sums required to be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund, the sum of Ninety-seven Million Four Hundred Fifty Thousand Three Hundred Thirty-two Dollars ($97,450,332.00) shall be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund during fiscal year 2013.

In addition to any other sums required to be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund, the sum of Twenty-three Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($23,100,000.00) shall be transferred from the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund during fiscal year 2014.

The State Fiscal Officer shall transfer the entire balance in the Health Care Trust Fund to the Health Care Expendable Fund during fiscal year 2015.

If Medicaid expenditures are projected to exceed the amount of funds appropriated to the Division of Medicaid in any fiscal year in excess of the expenditure reductions to providers, funds shall be transferred by the State Fiscal Officer from the Health Care Trust Fund into the Health Care Expendable Fund and then to the Governor’s Office, Division of Medicaid, in the amount and at such time as requested by the Governor to reconcile the deficit.

All income from the investment of the funds in the Health Care Expendable Fund shall be credited to the account of the Health Care Expendable Fund. Any funds in the Health Care Expendable Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund. Any funds appropriated from the Health Care Expendable Fund that are unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall lapse into the Health Care Expendable Fund.

The funds in the Health Care Expendable Fund shall be available for expenditure under specific appropriation by the Legislature beginning in fiscal year 2000, and shall be expended exclusively for health care purposes.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section may not be changed in any manner except upon amendment to that subsection by a bill enacted by the Legislature with a vote of not less than three-fifths (3/5) of the members of each house present and voting.

If the State Treasurer, in consultation with the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, determines that there is a need to borrow funds to offset any temporary cash-flow deficiencies in the Health Care Expendable Fund created in this section, the Treasurer may borrow those funds from any state-source special funds in the State Treasury in amounts that can be repaid from the Health Care Expendable Fund during the fiscal year in which the funds are borrowed. The State Treasurer shall immediately notify the Legislative Budget Office and the Department of Finance and Administration of each transfer into and out of the Health Care Expendable Fund.

No later than September 30, 2011, the State Treasurer shall transfer from the Health Care Expendable Fund to the Health Care Trust Fund an amount equivalent to the unencumbered ending cash balance of the Health Care Expendable Fund as of June 30, 2011, less Three Million Eight Hundred Forty Thousand Dollars ($3,840,000.00).

Subsections (1), (2), (3), (5), (6) and (7) of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2022.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 493, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 304, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 571, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 595, § 12; Laws, 2005, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 560, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 507, § 4; Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 118, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 563, § 6; Laws, 2010, ch. 562, § 6; Laws, 2011, ch. 506, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 547, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 518, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 534, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 471, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015); Laws, 2019, ch. 481, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 2019).

§ 43-13-409.
Board of Directors for Health Care Trust Fund and Health Care Expendable Fund; establishment; membership; powers.

There is established a board of directors to invest the funds in the Health Care Trust Fund and the Health Care Expendable Fund. The board of directors shall consist of thirteen (13) members as follows:

Seven (7) voting members as follows: the State Treasurer or his designee, the Attorney General or his designee, and one (1) member from each congressional district to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. Of the members appointed by the Governor, one (1) member shall be appointed for an initial term that expires on March 1, 2000; one (1) member shall be appointed for an initial term that expires on March 1, 2001; one (1) member shall be appointed for an initial term that expires on March 1, 2002; one (1) member shall be appointed for an initial term that expires on March 1, 2003; and one (1) member shall be appointed for an initial term that expires on March 1, 2004. Upon the expiration of any of the initial terms of office, the Governor shall appoint successors by and with the advice and consent of the Senate for terms of five (5) years from the expiration date of the previous term. Any member appointed by the Governor shall be eligible for reappointment. Each member appointed by the Governor shall possess knowledge, skill and experience in business or financial matters commensurate with the duties and responsibilities of the board of directors in administering the Health Care Trust Fund and the Health Care Expendable Fund.

Two (2) nonvoting, advisory members of the Senate shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, and one (1) nonvoting, advisory representative of the health care community shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, who shall serve for the length of the term of the appointing official and shall be eligible for reappointment.

Two (2) nonvoting, advisory members of the House of Representatives shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House, and one (1) nonvoting, advisory representative of the health care community shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House, who shall serve for the length of the term of the appointing official and shall be eligible for reappointment.

Any person appointed to fill a vacancy on the board of directors shall be appointed in the same manner as for a regular appointment and shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term only.

Nonlegislative members of the board of directors shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for each day’s official duties of the board at the same per diem as established by Section 25-3-69, and actual travel and lodging expenses as established by Section 25-3-41. Legislative members of the board of directors shall receive the same per diem and expense reimbursement as for attending committee meetings when the Legislature is not in regular session.

The State Treasurer shall be the chairman of the board of directors. The board of directors shall annually elect one (1) member to serve as vice chairman of the board. The vice chairman shall act as chairman in the absence of or upon the disability of the chairman or if there is a vacancy in the office of chairman.

All expenses of the board of directors in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this article, including the payment of per diem and expenses of the nonlegislative members of the board, shall be paid from funds appropriated to the State Treasurer’s Office for that purpose.

The board of directors shall invest the funds in the Health Care Trust Fund and the Health Care Expendable Fund in any of the investments authorized for the Mississippi Prepaid Affordable College Tuition Program under Section 37-155-9, and those investments shall be subject to the limitations prescribed by Section 37-155-9.

In furtherance of the powers granted under subsection (5) of this section, the board of directors shall have such powers as necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this article, including, but not limited to, the following express powers:

To contract for necessary goods and services, to employ necessary personnel, and to engage the services of consultants for administrative and technical assistance in carrying out its duties and responsibilities in administering the Health Care Trust Fund and the Health Care Expendable Fund;

To administer the Health Care Trust Fund and the Health Care Expendable Fund in a manner that is sufficiently actuarially sound to meet the obligations of this article and to establish a comprehensive investment plan for the purposes of this article, which shall specify the investment policies to be utilized by the board of directors in administering the funds;

Subject to the terms, conditions, limitations and restrictions specified in Section 37-155-9, the board of directors shall have power to sell, assign, transfer and dispose of any of the securities and investments of the Health Care Trust Fund and the Health Care Expendable Fund, provided that any such sale, assignment or transfer has the majority approval of the entire board; and

To annually prepare or cause to be prepared a report setting forth in appropriate detail an accounting of the Health Care Trust Fund and the Health Care Expendable Fund and a description of the financial condition of the funds at the close of each fiscal year, including any recommendations for legislation regarding the investment authority of the board of directors over the funds. The report shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislative Budget Office on or before September 1 of each fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 493, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 1999.).